Massachusetts, session 194th, S138.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 117A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following paragraph:-
Any person experiencing homelessness, (i) who has no established place of abode, or
who lives in a temporary emergency shelter, and (ii) who is otherwise eligible under the
provisions of this chapter, shall receive the same payment rate as recipients who incur shelter
costs including, but not limited to rent or a mortgage. The department shall promulgate or revise
any such rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. Chapter 117A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 10 the following new sections:-
of 2

Section 11. Effective July first of every year, the department shall increase the total
budget of each eligible recipient, before taking into consideration any available income and
resources, by a percentage amount equal to the percentage rise in the United States Consumer
Price Index for January first of that year over the level of said index for January first of the
previous year plus such additional percentage amount as is recommended annually by the
department and appropriated by the general court. The department shall promulgate such rules
and regulations to implement the provisions of this section.
Section 12. The department shall set the maximum benefit for the program in this chapter
at the same level as the program in chapter 118 of the General Laws. The department shall
promulgate such rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this section.
of 2